apertium-fin-udm/apertium-fin-udm.udm.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<dat%> !
%<gen%> !
%<adj%> !

%<prn%>
%<qst%>
%<np%>
%<cnjcoo%>
%<cnjsub%>
%<v%>
%<post%>

%<pers%>
%<ant%> 
%<itg%>
%<neg%>

%<pres%> 

%<tv%>
%<iv%>

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<f%>
%<m%>

%<nom%>
%<gen%>
%<dat%>
%<acc%>
%<abe%>
%<abl%>
%<ins%>
%<advl%>
%<approx%>

%<sent%>
%<cm%>
%<apos%>
%<guio%>

%{E%}   ! э or е
%>
%{j%}   ! 

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

Sojuzy ; 
Poslelogy ; 
Soobstvennoe ; 
Narechija ; 
Mestomenija ; 
Glagoly ;
Punktuacija ;
Prilagatelnoe ;

LEXICON K ! Clitics

%+а%<qst%>:%-а # ;
# ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P1-SG

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P2-SG

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P3-SG

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:лэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:е # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:лэсь # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ы # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:тэк # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<advl%>:я # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<approx%>:лань # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P1-PL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P2-PL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-P3-PL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:лэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ыз # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ты # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:лэсь # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:лы # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ын # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:тэк # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:ъя # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<approx%>:лань # ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG-MA

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:ма # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:мае # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:малэн # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:малэсь # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:малы # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:маин # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abe%>:матэк # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<advl%>:мая # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ine%>:кытын # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ill%>:кытчы # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ela%>:кытысь # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<egr%>:кытысен # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<term%>:кытчыозь # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pro%>:кытӥ # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<approx%>:малань # ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG-KIN

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>: # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:лэн # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:лы # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:э # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:эн # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abe%>:тэк # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:лэсь # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<advl%>:ъя # ; 
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<approx%>:лань # ; 

LEXICON GLAGOL-1-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<inf%>:ыны # ; 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ӥcько # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ӥcькод # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:э # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ӥcькомы # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ӥcькоды # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:о # ; 

LEXICON GLAGOL-2-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<inf%>:аны # ; 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:аcько # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:аcькод # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:а # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:аcькомы # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:аcькоды # ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:ло # ;

LEXICON GLAGOL-UG  ! отрицательные формы

%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:уг # ; 
%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:уд # ; 
%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:уз # ; 
%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ум # ; 
%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:уд # ; 
%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:уз # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ӧй # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ӧд # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ӧз # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ӧм # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ӧд # ; 
%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:ӧз # ; 

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;


LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON POST-INDECL 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: K ;
%<dat%>:%>лы K ;
%<gen%>:%>лэн K ;
%<ine%>:%>ын K ;

LEXICON CASE-MNZH

%<ill%>:%>ы K ;
%<ins%>:%>ын K ;
%<acc%>:%>ты K ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>:%>ыз K ;
%<pro%>:%>ытӥ K ; ! Dir/LR
%<pro%>:%>тӥ K ;

LEXICON CASE-ED

%<ill%>:%>%{E%} K ;
%<ins%>:%>%{E%}н K ;
%<acc%>:%>%{E%}з K ;
%<pro%>:%>%{E%}тӥ K ;

LEXICON NUMBER

%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<pl%>:%>%{j%}ос CASE ;
%<sg%>: CASE-ED ;
%<pl%>:%>%{j%}ос CASE-MNZH ;


LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NUMBER ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NUMBER ;


LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: NUMBER ; 

LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: NUMBER ;


LEXICON Poslelogy

аpтэ POST-INDECL ; 
беpе POST-INDECL ; 
быдэ POST-INDECL ; 
валче POST-INDECL ; 
дыpъя POST-INDECL ; 
кyзя POST-INDECL ; 
cямен POST-INDECL ; 
cяpыcь POST-INDECL ; 
ӵоже POST-INDECL ; 
ӵош POST-INDECL ; 

дор POST-DECL ;

LEXICON Sojuzy
 
но CC ;  ! "и"
ден CS ; ! ""

LEXICON Mestomenija 

кин PRON-ITG-KIN ; ! "кто"
ма: PRON-ITG-MA ;  ! "что"

мон PRON-PERS-P1-SG ; 
тон PRON-PERS-P2-SG ; 
со PRON-PERS-P3-SG ; 
ми PRON-PERS-P1-PL ; 
тӥ PRON-PERS-P2-PL ; 
соос PRON-PERS-P3-PL ; 

LEXICON Narechija

а%<qst%>:а # ;

кытын ADV-ITG ; ! "где" 
туж ADV ; ! "очень"
шудо ADV ; ! "весело"
шуныт ADV ; ! "тепло"
толон ADV ; ! "вчера" 
матэгес ADV ; ! "ближе"
али ADV ; ! "сейчас"  
кытчы ADV ; ! "куда"
котыр ADV ; ! "вокруг"
шуныт ADV ; ! "тепло"
туннэ ADV ; ! "сегодня"
котьку ADV; ! "всегда" 
каллен ADV ; ! "медленно" 
кезьыт ADV ; ! "холодно"     
ӝог ADV ; ! "быстро" 

ик ADV ; ! ""

LEXICON Soobstvennoe

Маша NP-ANT-F ;
Ваня NP-ANT-M ;

LEXICON Glagoly

уг: GLAGOL-UG ;

тодыны:тод GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "знать"
!кыpӟаны:кыpӟа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "петь"
шудыны:шуд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "играть"
адӟыны:адӟ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "видеть"
шуыны:шу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сказать"
шедьтыны:шедьт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "найти"
учкыны:учк GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "смотреть"
улыны:ул GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "жить"
кылыны:кыл GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "услышать"
кылӥськыны:кылӥськ GLAGOL-1-IV ; ! "слышаться"
карыны:кар GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "делать"
быгатыны:быгат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "мочь"
яратыны:ярат GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "любить"
юыны:ю GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "пить"
юаны:юа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "спросить"
утчаны:утч GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "искать"
утчаськыны:утчаськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разыскивать"
тыршыны:тырш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "стараться"
сиыны:си GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "есть"
серекъяны:серекъя GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "смеяться"
пытсаны:пытса GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "закрыть"
пырыны:пыр GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "заходить"
пукыны:пук GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "сидеть"
мыняны:мыня GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "улыбаться"
малпаны:малпа GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "думать"
лыктыны:лыкт GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "приходить"
лыдъяськыны:лыдъяськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "считать"
луыны:лу GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "быть"
кылзӥськыны:кылзӥськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "вслушиваться"
кельшыны:кельш GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "нравиться"
изьыны:изь GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "спать" 
дугдыны:дугд GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "остановиться"
вуыны:ву GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "прибыть"
вераськыны:вераськ GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "разговаривать"
вераны:вер GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "говорить"
ватскыны:ватск GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "спрятаться"
вамышъяны:вамышъ GLAGOL-2-TV ; ! "шагать"
бызьыны:бызь GLAGOL-1-TV ; ! "бегать"

LEXICON Prilagatelnoe

чебер A1 ; ! "красивый"
шуныт A1 ; ! "тёплый"
кезьыт A1 ; ! "холодный"
пичи A1 ; ! "маленький"
бадӟым A1 ; ! "большой"
умой A1 ; ! "хороший"

LEXICON Nouns

пуны N1 ; ! "собака"
сад N1 ; ! "сад"
куазь N1 ; ! "погода"
урам N1 ; ! "улица"
корка N1 ; ! "дом"
пияш N1 ; ! "мальчик"
нылаш N1 ; ! "девочка"
пинал N1 ; ! "ребёнок"
коӵыш N1 ; ! "кошка"
анай N1 ; ! "мама"
укно N1 ; ! "окно"
писпу N1 ; ! "дерево"
син N1 ; ! "глаз"
ки N1 ; ! "рука"
шудон N1 ; ! "игра"
юан N1 ; ! "вопрос"
валэктон N1 ; ! "ответ"
ӝӧк N1 ; ! "стол"
пукон N1 ; ! "стул"
куара N1 ; ! "звук"
тылобурдо N1 ; ! "птица"
пӧйшур N1 ; ! "животное"
йыр N1 ; ! "голова"
ву N1 ; ! "вода"

LEXICON Punktuacija

.%<sent%>:. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
!%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
